Alaska, session 34, SB230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 16.20.030(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) The land areas now included in the National Wildlife Refuge System that 06 are cited in this subsection are designated as state game refuges, and the board shall 07 assign them appropriate refuge names: 08 (1) Aleutian Islands Refuge (except Umnak, Unalaska, Akun, Akutan, 09 Sanak, and Tigalda Islands); 10 (2) Bering Sea Refuge (St. Matthews and Hall Islands [,] and Pinnacle 11 Islet in Bering Sea); 12 (3) Bogoslof Island Refuge; 13 (4) Chamisso Island Refuge; 14 (5) Forrester Island Refuge; 01 (6) Hazen Bay (Nunivakchak and Kirgegag Islands); 02 (7) Hazy Islands Refuge; 03 (8) Kenai National Moose Range; 04 (9) Kodiak National Wildlife Refuge; 05 (10) Nunivak Island Refuge; 06 (11) St. Lazaria Island Refuge; 07 (12) Semidi Islands Wildlife Refuge; 08 (13) Tuxedni Refuge (Islands in Tuxedni Harbor); 09 (14) Izembek Refuge, including the tide and submerged land described 10 as follows: 11 (A) Township 58 South, Range 91 West, Seward Meridian 12 Sections 1 - 4 13 Sections 9 - 13 [9 - 12] 14 (B) Township 58 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian 15 Sections 1 - 12 16 Sections 16 - 17 [1 - 9 17 SECTION 16] 18 (C) Township 57 South, Range 91 West, Seward Meridian 19 Section 13 20 Sections 24 - 26 21 Sections 34 - 36 [35 - 36] 22 (D) Township 57 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian 23 Sections 1 - 36 24 (E) Township 57 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian 25 Sections 5 - 7 26 Sections 18 - 19 27 Section 30 [5 - 6] 28 (F) Township 56 South, Range 87 West, Seward Meridian 29 Sections 1 - 6 30 Sections 10 - 11 31 (G) Township 56 South, Range 88 West, Seward Meridian 01 Sections 1 - 23 02 Sections 27 - 33 [27 - 32] 03 (H) Township 55 South, Range 87 West, Seward Meridian 04 Sections 1 - 36 05 (I) Township 56 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian 06 Sections 1 - 36 07 (J) Township 55 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian 08 Sections 1 - 36 09 (K) Township 55 South, Range 88 West, Seward Meridian 10 Sections 1 - 36 11 (L) Township 55 South, Range 86 West, Seward Meridian 12 Sections 6 - 7 13 Sections 18 - 19 14 Sections 30 - 31 15 (M) Township 56 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian 16 Sections 1 - 36 17 (N) Township 54 South, Range 87 West, Seward Meridian 18 Sections 35 - 36 19 (O) Township 54 South, Range 86 West, Seward Meridian 20 Section 31 [(ENTIRE TOWNSHIP)]; 21 (15) Cape Newenham National Wildlife Range, including tide and 22 submerged land in Chagvan Bay described as follows: 23 (A) Township 16 South, Range 75 West, Seward Meridian 24 Sections 1 - 2 [SECTION 1] 25 Sections 11 - 15 26 Sections 22 - 27 27 Sections 34 - 36 28 (B) Township 16 South, Range 74 West, Seward Meridian 29 Sections 5 - 9 [7 - 9] 30 Sections 17 - 19 31 Section 30; 01 (16) Clarence Rhodes National Wildlife Range; 02 (17) Arctic National Wildlife Range. 03 * Sec. 2. AS 16.20.030(a)(14), as amended by sec. 2, ch. 119, SLA 2010, is amended to 04 read: 05 (14) Izembek Refuge, including the tide and submerged land described 06 as follows: 07 (A) Township 58 South, Range 91 West, Seward Meridian 08 Sections 1 - 4 09 Sections 9 - 13 [9 - 12] 10 (B) Township 58 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian 11 Sections 1 - 12 12 Sections 16 - 17 [1 - 9 13 SECTION 16] 14 (C) Township 57 South, Range 91 West, Seward Meridian 15 Section 13 16 Sections 24 - 26 17 Sections 34 - 36 [35 - 36] 18 (D) Township 57 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian 19 Sections 1 - 36 20 (E) Township 57 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian 21 Sections 5 - 7 [5 - 6] 22 Section 12, N1/2, N1/2N1/2S1/2 23 Sections 18 - 19 24 Section 30 25 (F) Township 56 South, Range 87 West, Seward Meridian 26 Sections 1 - 6 27 Sections 10 - 11 28 Sections 26 - 35 29 (G) Township 56 South, Range 88 West, Seward Meridian 30 Sections 1 - 23 31 Section 25 01 Sections 27 - 33 [27 - 32] 02 Section 36 03 (H) Township 55 South, Range 87 West, Seward Meridian 04 Sections 1 - 36 05 (I) Township 56 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian 06 Sections 1 - 36 07 (J) Township 55 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian 08 Sections 1 - 36 09 (K) Township 55 South, Range 88 West, Seward Meridian 10 Sections 1 - 36 11 (L) Township 55 South, Range 86 West, Seward Meridian 12 Sections 6 - 7 13 Sections 18 - 19 14 Sections 30 - 31 15 (M) Township 56 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian 16 Sections 1 - 36 [(ENTIRE TOWNSHIP)] 17 (N) Township 57 South, Range 88 West, Seward Meridian 18 Sections 1 - 6 19 (O) Township 54 South, Range 87 West, Seward Meridian 20 Sections 35 - 36 21 (P) Township 54 South, Range 86 West, Seward Meridian 22 Section 31; 23 * Sec. 3. AS 16.20.030(a)(14), as amended by sec. 3, ch. 119, SLA 2010, is amended to 24 read: 25 (14) Izembek Refuge, including the tide and submerged land described 26 as follows: 27 (A) Township 58 South, Range 91 West, Seward Meridian 28 Sections 1 - 4 29 Sections 9 - 13 [9 - 12] 30 (B) Township 58 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian 31 Sections 1 - 12 01 Sections 16 - 17 [1 - 9 02 SECTION 16] 03 (C) Township 57 South, Range 91 West, Seward Meridian 04 Section 13 05 Sections 24 - 26 06 Sections 34 - 36 [35 - 36] 07 (D) Township 57 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian 08 Sections 1 - 36 09 (E) Township 57 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian 10 Sections 5 - 7 11 Sections 18 - 19 12 Section 30 [5 - 6] 13 (F) Township 56 South, Range 87 West, Seward Meridian 14 Sections 1 - 6 15 Sections 10 - 11 16 (G) Township 56 South, Range 88 West, Seward Meridian 17 Sections 1 - 23 18 Sections 27 - 33 [27 - 32] 19 (H) Township 55 South, Range 87 West, Seward Meridian 20 Sections 1 - 36 21 (I) Township 56 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian 22 Sections 1 - 36 23 (J) Township 55 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian 24 Sections 1 - 36 25 (K) Township 55 South, Range 88 West, Seward Meridian 26 Sections 1 - 36 27 (L) Township 55 South, Range 86 West, Seward Meridian 28 Sections 6 - 7 29 Sections 18 - 19 30 Sections 30 - 31 31 (M) Township 56 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian 01 Sections 1 - 36 02 (N) Township 54 South, Range 87 West, Seward Meridian 03 Sections 35 - 36 04 (O) Township 54 South, Range 86 West, Seward Meridian 05 Section 31 [(ENTIRE TOWNSHIP)]; 06 * Sec. 4. AS 16.20.032(a) is amended to read: 07 (a) The following state-owned land and water is established as the Palmer Hay 08 Flats State Game Refuge: 09 (1) Township 16 North, Range 1 West, Seward Meridian 10 Sections 1 - 12 11 Section 13: N1/2 12 Sections 14 - 18 13 Section 20: NE1/4 14 Section 21: N1/2; 15 (2) Township 17 North, Range 1 West, Seward Meridian 16 Section 25 17 Section 26: S1/2, S1/2 N1/2, N1/2 NE1/4, NE1/4 NW1/4 18 Section 27: S1/2, SE1/4 NE1/4 19 Section 31: Lot 4, SE1/4, E1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4 NE1/4, S1/2 20 SW1/4, NE1/4 21 Section 32: S1/2, S1/2 NE1/4, NE1/4 NE1/4, SE1/4 NW1/4 22 Sections 33 - 36; 23 (3) Township 17 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian 24 Section 19: Lots 3 and 4, E1/2 SW1/4, S1/2 SE1/4 25 Section 21: N1/2 SE1/4, S1/2 S1/2 26 Section 22: 27 excluding NW1/4 NW1/4 28 excluding N1/2 NE1/4 NW1/4 29 excluding NE1/4 NE1/4 NE1/4 30 excluding all portions of U.S. Survey No. 9024 31 Section 25 [: LOTS 1 - 6, NW1/4, N1/2 NE1/4, N1/2 SW1/4, 01 SW1/4 SW1/4] 02 Section 26: 03 SE1/4 NE1/4[,] 04 S1/2, excluding all portions of U.S. Survey No. 9024 05 Matanuska TWNST (USS 1169) Block 31, Lots 1 and 2 06 Section 27: Lot 1, N1/2, N1/2 S1/2, SE1/4 SW1/4, S1/2 SE1/4 07 Section 28: Lots 1 - 2, N1/2, SW1/4, N1/2 SE1/4, SW1/4 SE1/4 08 Section 29: N1/2, N1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4 09 Section 30: Lots 1 - 4, E1/2, E1/2 W1/2 10 Section 31 [: LOTS 1 - 10, NE1/4 NW1/4, SW1/4 NE1/4, N1/2 11 NE1/4] 12 Section 32: Lots 3 - 7, NE1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4, NE1/4 SE1/4, 13 including all state tide and submerged land 14 Section 33: Lots 5 - 9, S1/2 SE1/4, SW1/4 NW1/4, including all 15 state tide and submerged land 16 Section 34: Lots 1 - 3, E1/2 NW1/4, SW1/4, E1/2, excluding all 17 portions of U.S. Survey No. 9024 18 Section 35: [LOTS 1 - 5, NW1/4, N1/2 SW1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4, 19 N1/2 NE1/4, SW1/4 NE1/4, NW1/4 SE1/4,] excluding all 20 portions of U.S. Survey No. 9024 21 Section 36 [: LOTS 1 - 10, SE1/4 SW1/4, S1/2 SE1/4, NE1/4 22 SE1/4]; 23 (4) Township 17 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian 24 Sections 19 - 21: Tracts B and D, according to Plat No. 2012- 25 110, Palmer Recording District; 26 (5) Township 17 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian 27 U.S. Survey No. 1169: Lots 1 and 2, Block 31, within Section 28 26; 29 (6) Township 16 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian 30 Sections 4 - 9 31 Section 17: N1/2 01 Section 18: N1/2; 02 (7) Township 16 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian 03 Section 2: That portion lying westerly of Lot 7 and Parcel F of 04 U.S. Survey No. 9023 05 Section 3: That portion lying westerly of Lot 7, Lot 8, and 06 Parcel F of U.S. Survey No. 9023 07 Section 10: That portion lying westerly of Lot 4, Lot 5, and 08 Parcel C of U.S. Survey No. 9023 09 Section 15: That portion northerly of the left bank of the Knik 10 River and lying westerly of Lot 3, Lot 4, and Parcel A of U.S. 11 Survey No. 9023 12 Section 16: That portion northerly of the left bank of the Knik 13 River; 14 (8) Township 16 North, Range 2 West, Seward Meridian 15 Section 1: All, excluding South Hayfield Road right-of-way 16 Section 2: Lot 5 17 Section 11: Lots 1 and 3 - 6, N1/2 NE1/4 18 Section 12: Lots 1 - 4, N1/2 NW1/4, NE1/4 NE1/4; 19 (9) Township 17 North, Range 2 West, Seward Meridian 20 Section 36: That portion of the S1/2 S1/2 lying easterly of the 21 South Hayfield Road right-of-way. 22 * Sec. 5. AS 16.20.550 is amended to read: 23 Sec. 16.20.550. Port Moller Critical Habitat Area established. The 24 following described area is established as the Port Moller Critical Habitat Area: 25 (1) Township 50 South, Range 71 West, Seward Meridian 26 Sections 7 - 8 27 Section 14 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 28 Sections 15 - 17 29 Sections 21 - 23 30 Section 32; 31 (2) Township 51 South, Range 71 West, Seward Meridian 01 Section 3 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 02 Sections 4 - 5 03 Section 7 04 Sections 9 - 10 05 Sections 15 - 17; 06 (3) Township 49 South, Range 73 West, Seward Meridian 07 Sections 10 - 11 08 Section 12 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 09 Sections 13 - 16 10 Section 21 11 Section 24 12 Section 28; 13 (4) Township 51 South, Range 72 West, Seward Meridian 14 Sections 5 - 8 15 Sections 11 - 12; 16 (5) Township 50 South, Range 72 West, Seward Meridian 17 Sections 18 - 19 18 Sections 30 - 32; 19 (6) Township 50 South, Range 73 West, Seward Meridian 20 Sections 7 - 13 21 Sections 14 - 17 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 22 Section 18; 23 (7) Township 50 South, Range 74 West, Seward Meridian 24 Sections 5 - 7 25 Section 8 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 26 Sections 9 - 13 27 Sections 14 - 16 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 28 Sections 17 - 18 29 Section 20; 30 (8) Township 50 South, Range 75 West, Seward Meridian 31 Section 1 01 Sections 6 - 7 02 Section 12; 03 (9) Township 49 South, Range 75 West, Seward Meridian 04 Section 3 05 Sections 4 - 6 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 06 Sections 7 - 11 07 Sections 14 - 16 08 Sections 21 - 32; 09 (10) Township 48 South, Range 74 [75] West, Seward Meridian 10 Sections 15 - 18 11 Section 22 12 Sections 29 - 30 13 Section 31 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 14 Section 32; 15 (11) Township 48 South, Range 75 [76] West, Seward Meridian 16 Sections 13 - 17 17 Sections 19 - 23 18 Sections 25 - 27 19 Sections 29 - 30 20 Sections 34 - 35 21 Section 36 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)]; 22 (12) Township 50 South, Range 76 West, Seward Meridian 23 Section 1 24 Section 3 25 Section 4 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 26 Section 9 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 27 Sections 10 - 13 28 Sections 14 - 16 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 29 Sections 21 - 23 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 30 Sections 24 - 25 31 Sections 26 - 28 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)]; 01 (13) Township 49 South, Range 76 West, Seward Meridian 02 Sections 1 - 4 03 Sections 7 - 9 04 Sections 10 - 11 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 05 Sections 12 - 14 06 Sections 15 - 16 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 07 Sections 17 - 18 08 Section 21 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 09 Section 22 10 Sections 28 - 29 11 Sections 33 - 34; 12 (14) Township 49 South, Range 77 West, Seward Meridian 13 Sections 1 - 2 14 Sections 4 - 5 15 Sections 7 - 12 16 Sections 13 - 18 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)]; 17 (15) Township 48 South, Range 76 [77] West, Seward Meridian 18 Sections 20 - 23 19 Sections 26 - 28; 20 (16) Township 48 South, Range 77 [78] West, Seward Meridian 21 Sections 26 - 27 22 Sections 31 - 34; 23 (17) Township 49 South, Range 78 West, Seward Meridian 24 Sections 2 - 5 25 Sections 8 - 12 26 Sections 13 - 16 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 27 Section 17. 28 * Sec. 6. AS 16.20.565 is amended to read: 29 Sec. 16.20.565. Egegik Critical Habitat Area established. The following 30 described area is established as the Egegik Critical Habitat Area: 31 (1) Township 24 South, Range 51 West, Seward Meridian 01 Sections 1 - 2 02 Section 11 N [S] 1/2 03 Section 12 N 1/2; 04 (2) Township 23 South, Range 51 West, Seward Meridian 05 Section 13 06 Sections 24 - 25 07 Sections 35 - 36; 08 (3) Township 23 South, Range 50 West, Seward Meridian 09 Section 7 10 Sections 18 - 19 11 Section 30 12 Section 31 (not tide or submerged land). 13 * Sec. 7. AS 16.20.570 is amended to read: 14 Sec. 16.20.570. Pilot Point Critical Habitat Area established. The following 15 described area is established as the Pilot Point Critical Habitat Area: 16 (1) Township 30 South, Range 52 West, Seward Meridian (protracted) 17 Sections 1 - 3 18 Section 12; 19 (2) Township 30 South, Range 51 West, Seward Meridian (protracted) 20 Sections 5 - 8 21 Section 17; 22 (3) Township 31 South, Range 51 West, Seward Meridian (protracted) 23 Sections 5 - 8 24 Sections 13 - 15 25 Sections 17 - 27; 26 (4) Township 30 South, Range 52 West, Seward Meridian (protracted) 27 Sections 27 - 29 28 Sections 31 - 34; 29 (5) Township 31 South, Range 52 West, Seward Meridian (protracted) 30 Sections 1 - 3 31 Sections 5 - 6 01 Sections 11 - 14 02 Sections 23 - 24; 03 (6) Township 30 South, Range 53 West, Seward Meridian (protracted) 04 Section 36; 05 (7) Township 31 South, Range 53 West, Seward Meridian (protracted) 06 Sections 1 - 2 07 Sections 10 - 11 08 Sections 12 - 14 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 09 Sections 15 - 16 10 Sections 20 - 21 11 Sections 22 - 28 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 12 Sections 29 - 31 13 Sections 32 - 36 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)]; 14 (8) Township 31 [32] South, Range 54 West, Seward Meridian 15 (protracted) 16 Section 36. 17 * Sec. 8. AS 16.20.580 is amended to read: 18 Sec. 16.20.580. Fox River Flats Critical Habitat Area established. The 19 following described area is established as the Fox River Flats Critical Habitat Area: 20 (1) Township 4 South, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian 21 Section 20: SE 1/4 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 22 Section 21: S 1/2 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 23 Section 22: S 1/2 24 Section 23: S 1/2 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)] 25 Sections 25 - 29 26 Sections 33 - 36; 27 (2) Township 4 South, Range 9 West, Seward Meridian 28 Section 30: W 1/2 [(NOT TIDE OR SUBMERGED LAND)]. 29 * Sec. 9. AS 16.20.590(a) is amended to read: 30 (a) The following described area is established as the Kachemak Bay Critical 31 Habitat Area: 01 (1) Township 4 South, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian (only tide 02 and submerged land and waters); 03 (2) Township 4 South, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian (only tide 04 and submerged land and waters); 05 (3) Township 5 South, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian (only tide 06 and submerged land and waters); 07 (4) [(3)] Township 5 South, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian (only 08 tide and submerged land and waters); 09 (5) [(4)] Township 5 South, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian (only 10 tide and submerged land and waters); 11 (6) [(5)] Township 6 South, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian (only 12 tide and submerged land and waters); 13 (7) [(6)] Township 6 South, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian (only 14 tide and submerged land and waters); 15 (8) [(7)] Township 6 South, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian (only 16 tide and submerged land and waters); 17 (9) [(8)] Township 6 South, Range 14 West, Seward Meridian (only 18 tide and submerged land and waters); 19 (10) [(9)] Township 7 South, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian (only 20 tide and submerged land and waters); 21 (11) [(10)] Township 7 South, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian (only 22 tide and submerged land and waters); 23 (12) [(11)] Township 7 South, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian (only 24 tide and submerged land and waters); 25 (13) [(12)] Township 7 South, Range 14 West, Seward Meridian (only 26 tide and submerged land and waters); 27 (14) [(13)] Township 8 South, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian (only 28 tide and submerged land and waters); 29 (15) [(14)] Township 8 South, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian (only 30 tide and submerged land and waters); 31 (16) [(15)] Township 8 South, Range 14 West, Seward Meridian (only 01 tide and submerged land and waters); 02 (17) [(16)] Township 9 South, Range 14 West, Seward Meridian (only 03 tide and submerged land and waters); 04 (18) [(17)] Township 9 South, Range 15 West, Seward Meridian (only 05 tide and submerged land and waters east of a line from Anchor Point to Point 06 Pogibshi); 07 (19) [(18)] Township 5 South, Range 15 West, Seward Meridian 08 (including all tide and submerged land and waters east of a line from Anchor Point to 09 Point Pogibshi); 10 (20) [(19)] Township 6 South, Range 15 West, Seward Meridian 11 (including all tide and submerged land and waters east of a line from Anchor Point to 12 Point Pogibshi); 13 (21) [(20)] Township 7 South, Range 15 West, Seward Meridian 14 (including all tide and submerged land and waters east of a line from Anchor Point to 15 Point Pogibshi); 16 (22) [(21)] Township 8 South, Range 15 West, Seward Meridian 17 (including all tide and submerged land and waters east of a line from Anchor Point to 18 Point Pogibshi); 19 (23) [(22)] Township 9 South, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian (only 20 tide and submerged land and waters). 21 * Sec. 10. AS 41.23.286 is amended to read: 22 Sec. 41.23.286. Jonesville Public Use Area. Subject to valid existing rights, 23 the vacant and unappropriated state-owned land and water and the state land and water 24 acquired in the future that lie within the following boundaries described in this section 25 are designated as the Jonesville Public Use Area, are reserved for all uses compatible 26 with their primary function as public use land, and are assigned to the department for 27 control and management: 28 (1) Township 19 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian 29 Section 1: That portion easterly of Moose Creek 30 Section 12: That portion of N1/2, N1/2SW1/4, and N1/2SE1/4 31 easterly of Moose Creek 01 Section 13: NE1/4, SE1/4NW1/4, and S1/2 02 Section 24: All; 03 (2) Township 19 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian 04 Section 2: All 05 Section 3: All 06 Section 4: All 07 Section 5: All 08 Section 6: All 09 Section 7: All 10 Section 8: All 11 Section 9: All 12 Section 10: All 13 Section 11: All 14 Section 14: NE1/4 15 Section 15: N1/2NE1/4 [AND THE NORTH 960 FEET OF 16 THE EAST 1,815 FEET OF THE NW1/4 FOR EACH 17 RECORD OF SURVEY FILED AS 86-85RS P.R.D.] 18 Section 16: All 19 Section 17: All 20 Section 18: All 21 Section 19: NE1/4, E1/2NW1/4, NE1/4SW1/4, NW1/4SE1/4, 22 and Government Lots 1, 2, and 4 23 Section 20: N1/2NE1/4, N1/2NW1/4, and SW1/4NW1/4 24 Section 21: N1/2NW1/4; 25 (3) Township 20 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian 26 Section 36: That portion easterly of Moose Creek; 27 (4) Township 20 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian 28 Section 31: All 29 Section 32: All 30 Section 33: All 31 Section 34: All 01 Section 35: All. 02 * Sec. 11. Section 2 of this Act takes effect on the effective date of sec. 2, ch. 119, SLA 03 2010. 04 * Sec. 12. Section 3 of this Act takes effect on the effective date of sec. 3, ch. 119, SLA 05 2010. 06 * Sec. 13. Except as provided in secs. 11 and 12 of this Act, this Act takes effect 07 immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.